Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 69. Organization and Corporate Procedures.
Sec. 21.69.640.
Extinguishment of unused corporate charters.

The corporate charter of a corporation formed under the laws of this state more than three years before July 1, 1966, for the purpose of becoming an insurer, which corporation, within the three-year period, has not actively engaged in business as a domestic insurer under a certificate of authority issued to it by the director under laws then in force, is extinguished and nullified.

The corporate charter of any other corporation formed under the laws of this state for the purpose of becoming an insurer, and which corporation during any period of 36 consecutive months after July 1, 1966, is not actively engaged in business as a domestic insurer under a certificate of authority issued to it by the director under law currently in force, is automatically extinguished and nullified at the expiration of the 36-month period.

The period during which the corporation referred to in (b) of this section is the subject of delinquency proceedings under AS 21.78 shall not be counted as part of the 36-month period.

Upon merger or consolidation of a domestic insurer with another insurer under this chapter, the corporate charter of the merged or consolidated domestic insurer is automatically extinguished and nullified.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.645.
Redomestication.

An insurer organized under the laws of another state and admitted to do business in this state may become a domestic insurer of this state by complying with the requirements of this title relative to the organization and licensing of a domestic insurer and by designating its principal place of business at a place in this state.

A domestic insurer may, upon approval of the director, transfer its domicile to another state in which it is admitted to transact the business of insurance. Upon a transfer as described in this subsection, the insurer shall cease to be a domestic insurer of this state but shall be considered admitted to this state. The insurer shall meet the qualifications to remain admitted to this state for a period of three years or, if ordered by the director, a longer period. The director may approve a proposed transfer unless the transfer is not in the interest of the policyholders of the insurer or the insurance marketplace of this state.

Upon transfer of domestic status to or from this state, the certificate of authority, appointments under AS

21.27.100

, rates, and other items that the director allows, and that are in existence at the time the insurer is licensed to transact the business of insurance in this state, shall continue in full force and effect and the insurer shall remain duly qualified to transact the business of insurance in this state. Outstanding policies of a transferring insurer shall remain in full force and effect and shall be endorsed with the new name of the company, its new location, and any other information the director may require. A transferring insurer shall notify the director of the details of the proposed transfer 30 days before the effective date of the transfer and shall promptly file any resulting amendments to corporate documents filed or required to be filed with the director.

A transfer of domestic status by merger, consolidation, or any other lawful method of combination must meet the requirements of AS

21.69.590

or

21.69.600

. The certificate of authority, appointments under AS

21.27.100

, rates, and other items that the director allows, and that are in existence at the time the insurer is licensed to transact the business of insurance in this state, shall continue in full force and effect, and the insurer shall remain duly qualified to transact the business of insurance in this state. Outstanding policies of a domestic insurer being merged, consolidated, or otherwise combined shall remain in full force and effect, and shall be endorsed with the new name of the company, its new location, and any other information the director may require.

An insurer that is transferring its domicile to this state shall file its revised policy forms for approval under AS 21.42.

A domestic insurer that is transferring its domicile to another state is not required to file policy forms at the time of transfer if the forms have already been approved under AS 21.42.

History.

(§ 95 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.69.648.
Voluntary surrender of certificate of authority.

To voluntarily surrender the certificate of authority of a domestic insurer, a request shall be made to the director to extinguish the certificate of authority six months before the planned effective date of the extinguishment of the charter. Before the request is granted, the director shall conduct an examination under AS

21.06.120

. The examination shall be completed within 12 months before the effective date of an extinguishment and all issues contained in the examination report must be resolved to the satisfaction of the director. Insurance business of the domestic insurer shall be cancelled or reinsured as required under AS

21.69.610

or

21.69.620

.

History.

(§ 95 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.69.650.
National emergency provisions.

The legislature declares that it is desirable for the general welfare and in particular for the welfare of insurance beneficiaries, policyholders, injured claimants, and others that the business of domestic insurers be continued notwithstanding the event of a national emergency.
The specific purpose of AS

21.69.650

—

21.69.690

is to facilitate the continued operation of domestic insurers in the event that a national emergency is caused by an attack on the United States or by a nuclear, atomic, or other disaster which makes it impossible or impracticable for an insurer to conduct its business in strict accord with applicable provisions of law, its bylaws, or its charter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.660.
Adoption of emergency bylaws.

The board of directors of a domestic insurer may at any time adopt emergency bylaws, subject to repeal or change by action of those having power to adopt regular bylaws for the insurer, which shall be operative during a national emergency and which may, notwithstanding any different provisions of the regular bylaws, or of the applicable statutes, or of the insurer’s charter, make any provision that may be reasonably necessary for the operation of the insurer during the period of the emergency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.670.
Provisions in lieu of emergency bylaws.

If the board of directors of a domestic insurer has not adopted emergency bylaws, the following provisions become effective upon the occurrence of a national emergency:

Three directors constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at all meetings of the board.

A vacancy in the board may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director.

If there are no surviving directors, but at least three vice presidents of the insurer survive, the three vice presidents with the longest term of service shall be the directors and shall possess all of the powers of the previous board of directors and the powers that are granted herein or by subsequently enacted legislation. By a majority vote the emergency board of directors may elect other directors. If there are not at least three surviving vice presidents, the director of insurance or designated person exercising the powers of director of insurance shall appoint three persons as directors who shall possess all of the powers of the previous board of directors and the powers that are granted herein or by subsequently enacted legislation, and these persons by majority vote may elect other directors.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.680.
Succession of corporate officers during national emergency.

At any time the board of directors of a domestic insurer may, by resolution, provide that in the event of a national emergency and in the event of the death or incapacity of the president, the secretary, or the treasurer of the insurer, the officers, or any of them, shall be succeeded in the office by the person named or described in a succession list adopted by the board of directors.
The list may be on the basis of named persons or position titles, must establish the order of priority, and may prescribe the conditions under which the powers of the office shall be exercised.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.690.
Relocation of home office during national emergency.

At any time the board of directors of a domestic insurer may, by resolution, provide that in the event of a national emergency the home office or principal place of business of the insurer shall be at the location named or described in the resolution.
The resolution may provide for alternate locations and establish an order of preference.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.700.
Stock insurer defined.

A domestic “stock” insurer is an incorporated insurer with capital divided into shares and owned by its stockholders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 69 to 78.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 99 to 108.

Sec. 21.69.710.
Mutual insurer defined.

A domestic “mutual” insurer is an incorporated insurer without capital stock, and the governing body of which is elected by the policyholders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 74-80.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 171-184.